Washington statutes.
RCW 2.72.050

Administrator may develop rules.

The public guardianship administrator may develop rules to implement this chapter. The administrator shall request and consider recommendations from the *advisory committee in the development of rules.

[ 2007 c 364 s 7.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Section 5, chapter 364, Laws of 2007, which provided for the advisory committee, was vetoed by the governor.